Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.201

Form of subpoena.

FORM OF SUBPOENA

State of Washington,

County of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .,











ss.

To . . . . . . . . . . . . . . :

In the name of the state of Washington, you are hereby required to appear before the undersigned, one of the justices of the peace in and for said county, on the . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . . ., at . . . . o'clock in the . . . . noon, at his or her office in . . . . . ., to give evidence in a certain cause, then and there to be tried, between A B, plaintiff, and C D, defendant, on the part of (the plaintiff, or defendant as the case may be).

Given under my hand this . . . . day of . . . . . . . ., (year) . . . .

J. P., Justice of the Peace.

[ 2016 c 202 s 13; 2010 c 8 s 3014; 1957 c 89 s 4. Prior: Code 1881 s 1885, part; 1873 p 373 c 16, part; 1863 p 370 c 16, part; 1854 p 253 c 19, part; RRS s 1890, part.]